District of Columbia statutes.
29-604.04

Liability for contributions.

(a)

A person’s obligation to make a contribution to a partnership is not excused by the person’s death, disability, or other inability to perform personally.

(b)

If a person does not fulfill an obligation to make a contribution other than money, the person is obligated at the option of the partnership to contribute money equal to the value of the part of the contribution which has not been made.

(c)

The obligation of a person to make a contribution may be compromised only by consent of all partners. If a creditor of a limited liability partnership extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on an obligation described in subsection (a) of this section, without notice of a compromise under this subsection, the creditor may enforce the obligation.

History

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(4)(D), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-601.04, § 29-604.08, § 29-605.03, § 29-606.01, and § 29-606.03.

Editor's Notes

Section 2(f)(4)(C) of D.C. Law 19-210 redesignated former § 20-604.04 as § 29-604.07.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.